Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-107
Contempt; maximum fine.

Should a fine be imposed for any offense mentioned in section 50-105, it shall not exceed fifty dollars.

R.S.1866, c. 31, § 9, p. 250;

R.S.1913, § 3748;

C.S.1922, § 3141;

C.S.1929, § 50-107;

R.S.1943, § 50-107.